California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 23.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

37405.

Monterey cheese or monterey jack cheese is a food that complies with Section 133.153 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 23.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

37406.

High-moisture jack cheese is a food that complies with Section 133.154 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 23.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

37407.

Cream cheese is a food that complies with Section 133.133 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 23.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

37408.

Cream cheese with other foods is a food that complies with Section 133.134 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 23.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

37409.

Pasteurized neufchatel cheese spread with other foods is a food that complies with Section 133.178 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 23.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

37410.

Pasteurized process cheese is a food that complies with Section 133.169 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 23.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

37411.

Pasteurized process cheese food is a food that complies with Section 133.173 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 23.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

37412.

Pasteurized cheese spread is a food that complies with Section 133.175 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 23.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

37413.

Cold-pack cheese is a food that complies with Section 133.123 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 23.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

37414.

Cold-pack cheese food is a food that complies with Section 133.124 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 23.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Cottage Cheese [37501. - 37505.]

37501.

Dry curd cottage cheese is a food that complies with Section 133.129 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 23.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

37502.

Cottage cheese is a food that complies with Section 133.128 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Lowfat cottage cheese is a food that complies with Section 133.131 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 23.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

37503.

For the purposes of this article, dry curd cottage cheese or cottage cheese made from goat’s milk are special varieties of cheese.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 3.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

37504.

If dry curd cottage cheese or cottage cheese is made from certified raw milk, it shall be labeled as being made from certified raw milk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 4.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

37505.

The packaging of dry curd cottage cheese or cottage cheese, and the addition of milk products to dry curd cottage cheese to make cottage cheese shall take place only in a licensed milk products plant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 5.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Labeling [37601. - 37601.]

37601.

Any cheese sold in this state shall be labeled in compliance with Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 23.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Miscellaneous Dairy Products [38151. - 38895.2.]



  ARTICLE 1. Milk Fat or Butter Fat [38151. - 38152.]

38151.

As used in this article, “Reichert-Meissl number” means the number of milliliters of decinormal alkali which are required to neutralize the acidity of the distillate from five grams of fat treated in the manner specified in the regulations adopted by the director. Such regulations shall conform as closely as possible to the methods which are described in the book, entitled “Official and Tentative Methods of Analysis of the Association of Official Analytical Chemists,” published from time to time by that association.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

38152.

Milk fat or butterfat is the fat of milk. It shall have a Reichert-Meissl number not less than 24 and a specific gravity not less than 905/1000. In determining the specific gravity, milk fat at 40 degrees centigrade shall be compared with water at 40 degrees centigrade.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 9.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Skim Milk, Nonfat Milk, or Fat-free Milk [38181. - 38186.]

38181.

Skim milk, nonfat milk, or fat-free milk is the product that results from the complete or partial removal of milk fat from milk. It shall contain not more than twenty hundredths of 1 percent of milk fat and not less than 9 percent of milk solids not fat, except that milk produced and marketed pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 35921) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of this division as skim milk shall contain not more than twenty hundredths of 1 percent of milk fat and not less than 8.5 percent of milk solids not fat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 7.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

38182.

Skim milk, nonfat milk, or fat-free milk shall conform to the bacterial standards, coliform bacteria standards, and temperature standards of the grade or class of milk from which the skim milk is derived.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 8.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

38183.

All fluid skim milk which is sold for human consumption as such shall be derived from market milk.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

38184.

Every container in which skim milk, nonfat milk, or fat-free milk is sold shall be plainly and conspicuously labeled with all of the following:

(a) The words “skim milk,” “nonfat milk,” or “fat-free milk.”

(b) The word “raw” or “pasteurized,” as the case may be.

(c) The grade or class of the milk.

(d) The name and address of the distributor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 9.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

38185.

Every label which is required by this article shall be in letters of a size or boldness as to be legible by the purchaser or consumer. If the available space on any cap, bottle, or container for such labeling is not sufficient for the full name of the distributor, a sufficient portion of the distributor’s name which clearly identifies such distributor may be used in lieu of the entire distributor’s name.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 134.)
-------------------------------------------

38186.

Every container of skim milk, nonfat milk, or fat-free milk, except a glass container, shall be labeled with the words “skim milk,” “nonfat milk,” or “fat-free milk” in letters not less than one-quarter inch in height and one-eighth inch in width.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 10.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Lowfat Milk or Light Milk [38191. - 38192.]

38191.

Lowfat milk or light (lite) milk is a market milk product with added milk solids derived from market milk. Lowfat milk or light milk shall contain not less than 0.9 percent milk fat, not more than 1.1 percent milk fat, and not less than 11 percent of milk solids not fat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 12.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

38192.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, lowfat milk or light (lite) milk shall meet all standards and requirements that are specified in this division for market milk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 13.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Reduced-fat Milk [38211. - 38213.]

38211.

Reduced-fat milk is a market milk product. It shall contain not less than 1.9 percent milk fat, not more than 2.1 percent milk fat, and not less than 10 percent of milk solids not fat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 16.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

38213.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, reduced-fat milk shall meet all standards and requirements that are specified in this division for market milk. It shall be labeled “reduced-fat milk.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 17.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. High Nutrient Lowfat Milk [38221. - 38224.]

38221.

(a) High nutrient lowfat milk is a market milk product with added milk solids derived from market milk. It shall contain not less than 1.0 percent milk fat or more than 1.2 percent milk fat and not less than 13.1 percent of total milk solids.

(b) In addition to any other vitamins and minerals which may be added, it shall contain the following vitamins and minerals: vitamin C, niacinamide, pyridoxine hydrochloride, calcium panothenate, magnesium, and zinc. When added, each of the above listed vitamins and minerals shall provide at least 25 percent of the United States Recommended Daily Allowance in an eight ounce serving.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

38222.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, high nutrient lowfat milk shall meet all standards and requirements which are specified in this division for market milk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

38224.

High nutrient lowfat milk shall be labeled in accordance with statutes and regulations applicable to vitamin and mineral addition. The phrase “multiple vitamins and minerals added” shall appear with the product on the principal display panel or panels.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Evaporated Milk [38231. - 38231.]

38231.

Evaporated milk is a food that complies with Section 131.130 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 26.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Evaporated Cream or Clotted Cream [38241. - 38241.]

38241.

Evaporated cream or clotted cream is cream from which a considerable portion of moisture has been evaporated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Evaporated Reduced-Fat Milk or Condensed Reduced-Fat Milk [38251. - 38253.]

38251.

Evaporated reduced-fat milk or condensed reduced-fat milk is the liquid food obtained by the partial removal of water and milk fat from milk. The milk fat and total milk solids content of the food shall not be less than 2 percent and 19.5 percent, respectively. Evaporated reduced-fat milk shall contain added vitamins A and D as prescribed in Section 38252. These products shall be homogenized and packaged in hermetically sealed containers and so processed by heat, either before or after sealing, so as to prevent spoilage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 19.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

38252.

The following vitamin requirements shall be followed:

(a) Vitamin A shall be present in such quantity that each fluid ounce of the food contains not less than 125 International Units thereof, within limits of good manufacturing practice.

(b) Vitamin D shall be present in such quantity that each fluid ounce of the food contains 25 International Units thereof within limits of good manufacturing practice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 298, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

38253.

The following safe and suitable optional ingredients may be used:

(a) Carriers for vitamins A and D.

(b) Emulsifiers.

(c) Stabilizers, with or without dioctyl sodium sulfosuccinate (when permitted by and complying with the provisions of Section 172.810 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations).

(d) Characterizing flavoring ingredients, with or without coloring as follows: 

(1) Fruit and fruit juice, including concentrated fruit and fruit juice.

(2) Natural and artificial food flavoring.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 298, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Evaporated Skimmed Milk [38261. - 38261.]

38261.

Evaporated skimmed milk is a food that complies with Section 131.132 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 28.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Dry Whole Milk [38361. - 38361.]

38361.

Dry whole milk is a food that complies with Section 131.147 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 30.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Extra Grade Edible Dry Whey, Dry Buttermilk, and Modified Dry Whey [38391. - 38401.]

38391.

Extra grade edible dry whey is the product which results by spray drying sweet, fresh cheese whey which has been pasteurized, either before or during the process of manufacture at a temperature of 145 degrees Fahrenheit for 30 minutes or its equivalent in bacterial destruction, and to which no alkali or other chemical has been added.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

38392.

Extra grade edible dry whey and its reliquefied form shall have a clean whey flavor, free from objectional and nonwhey flavors and odors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

38393.

Extra grade edible dry whey shall contain not more than 50,000 bacteria per gram, not more than 1.25 percent of milk fat, not more than 5.00 percent of moisture, and not more than 0.16 percent of titratable acidity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

38394.

The alkalinity of ash which is contained in extra grade edible dry whey shall not exceed 225 ml. 0.1 normal hydrochloric acid (0.1 N HCl) per 100 grams. The scorched particle content shall be not more than 15.0 mg. and the solubility index shall be not more than 1.25 ml.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

38395.

Extra grade edible dry whey shall have a uniform light color, free from lumps that do not break up under moderate pressure, and practically free from brown and black scorched particles.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

38396.

Each container of extra grade edible dry whey shall be labeled with the full name of the product and with the word “pasteurized” when filled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

38397.

Buttermilk for drying shall be fresh, sweet and from the churning of sweet cream butter, with or without the addition of harmless lactic culture and unless cultured, shall be held at 45 degrees Fahrenheit or lower until processed. No neutralizing agent or chemical preservative may be added. The product shall be labeled “Extra Grade Dry Buttermilk.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 537.)
-------------------------------------------

38398.

Modified dry whey means the class of foods manufactured from fresh, pasteurized, cheese whey by various processes and procedures under conditions prescribed by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

38399.

Safe and suitable substances, as defined in Section 130.3 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations, may be used in the chemical, physical, or microbial processing of whey during the manufacture of modified whey products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

38400.

The maximum standard plate count for modified dry whey shall not exceed 50,000 per gram, and the maximum coliform bacteria count shall not exceed 10 per gram. All other chemical, physical, and bacteriological standards for modified dry whey shall be consistent with, but shall not exceed, requirements established under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

38401.

Each container of modified dry whey shall be labeled “Modified Dry Whey.” The label shall also contain a descriptive term of the modification, approved in writing by the director, and a compositional analysis of the finished product. Except for bacterial counts, the compositional analysis shall include those values commonly associated with determining the grade of dry whey.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Nonfat Dry Milk [38421. - 38421.]

38421.

Nonfat dry milk is a food that complies with Section 131.125 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Grade A nonfat dry milk shall contain not more than 30,000 bacteria per gram and not more than 10 coliform bacteria per gram. Manufacturing grade nonfat dry milk shall comply with standards of the United States Department of Agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 339, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Milk Drink Mix [38451. - 38455.]

38451.

Milk drink mix is a market milk product. It shall contain not less than 12 percent total milk solids, not less than 4 percent butterfat, and not more than one-half of 1 percent of pure and harmless edible stabilizer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

38452.

Milk drink mix shall contain no milk or milk products except market milk and milk products which are derived from market milk.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

38453.

Milk drink mix may contain sweetening and harmless flavoring and coloring.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

38454.

Milk drink mix shall be pasteurized and shall contain not more than 75,000 bacteria per gram.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

38455.

Each manufacturer of milk drink mix shall, upon request of the department, submit the names and delivery locations of all persons that receive milk drink mix from such manufacturer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Milk Drink [38511. - 38512.]

38511.

Milk drink is the product which is made from milk drink mix or UHT milk drink mix and which contains not less than 3.5 percent of milk fat nor more than 75,000 bacteria per gram.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 13.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

38512.

No milk or milk products, except market milk, market skim milk, or market cream, shall be combined with, or added to, milk drink mix or UHT milk drink mix in the freezing device in the making of milk drinks.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective September 15, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Milk, Reduced-Fat Milk, Lowfat Milk, or Light Milk, and Nonfat Milk, Skim Milk, or Fat-Free Milk with Lactobacillus Acidophilus Culture Added [38522. - 38523.]

38522.

Milk with lactobacillus acidophilus culture added, reduced-fat milk with lactobacillus acidophilus culture added, lowfat or light (lite) milk with lactobacillus acidophilus culture added, and nonfat or fat-free milk with lactobacillus acidophilus culture added means a market milk product that has been pasteurized, cooled to a temperature not exceeding 45 °F, and afterwards inoculated with a pure culture of lactobacillus acidophilus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 20.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

38523.

The manufacture, labeling, and sale of acidophilus milk and milk, reduced-fat milk, lowfat or light (lite) milk, and nonfat or fat-free milk with lactobacillus acidophilus culture added shall be in accordance with regulations adopted by the secretary after a hearing that is duly called. Interested parties shall be notified of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 21.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 18. Modified Milk [38531. - 38531.]

38531.

Modified milk is market milk, evaporated milk, or powdered milk which has been altered in composition to conform to special nutritional requirements and which contains no fat or oil except milk fat.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 19. Cultured Milks [38541. - 38542.]

38541.

Cultured milks are foods that comply with Section 131.112 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 22.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

38542.

Every container in which buttermilk is sold shall be labeled with a label containing all of the following information:

(a) The name and address of the distributor.

(b) The factory license number of the manufacturer, if the manufacturer is not the distributor.

(c) A statement that the product is pasteurized, if pasteurized.

(d) A statement that the product is cultured.

(e) A list of ingredients added, such as salt, stabilizers, and flavoring.

(f) If the principal label uses descriptive modifying terms, such terms shall not be false or misleading.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 347.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 21. Pasteurized Concentrated Milk [38601. - 38602.]

38601.

Pasteurized concentrated milk is market milk which has been reduced to a semiliquid state by the removal of a portion of its water content by the aid of heat or the product derived from combining concentrated skim milk derived from market milk with market cream. It shall contain not less than 9.9 percent of milk fat and not less than 24 percent of milk solids not fat. It shall otherwise meet and be subject to all the requirements and standards for market milk, except as follows:

(a) It may be pasteurized before concentration but shall be pasteurized after concentration.

(b) It shall contain not more than 20,000 bacteria per gram.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

38602.

Pasteurized concentrated milk shall be packaged in containers other than hermetically sealed containers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 22. Concentrated Skim Milk [38631. - 38633.]

38631.

Concentrated skim milk is skim milk which is derived from market milk that has been reduced to a semiliquid state by the removal of a portion of its water content by the aid of heat.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

38632.

Concentrated skim milk shall contain not less than 24 percent of milk solids not fat.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

38633.

When concentrated skim milk is made entirely from grade A milk, its manufacturer may label it grade A.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 954.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 23. Flavored Milk [38651. - 38655.]

38651.

Flavored milk is market milk to which has been added a stabilizer, sugar, syrup, or flavor made from wholesome ingredients. Flavored milk may be sold as flavored milk, flavored reduced-fat milk, flavored lowfat or light (lite) milk, flavored high nutrient lowfat milk, and flavored nonfat skim or fat-free milk. Flavored milk shall be labeled with the name of the product. The principal flavor may be substituted for the word “flavored” in the name of the product as, for example, “chocolate nonfat milk” in substitution for “flavored nonfat milk.” Flavored milk shall be so colored or contain ingredients that cause it to differ distinctly from milk in appearance and other characteristics.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 23.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

38652.

(a) Flavored milk is pasteurized, homogenized milk which meets all standards and requirements which are specified in this division for pasteurized, homogenized milk, and which are specified in Section 38651, except flavored milk shall contain not less than 3.25 percent milk fat.

(b) Flavored milk made from goat milk need not be homogenized, and shall contain not less than 2.8 percent fat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 512, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

38653.

Flavored lowfat milk shall contain not more than 1.2 percent milk fat. Flavored reduced-fat milk shall contain not more than 2.1 percent milk fat, and shall otherwise meet all standards and requirements that are specified in this division for lowfat or reduced-fat milk, and which are specified in Section 38651.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 24.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

38654.

Flavored nonfat skim or fat-free milk shall contain not more than twenty hundredths of 1 percent of milk fat, and shall otherwise meet all standards and requirements that are specified in this division for skim milk, nonfat milk or fat-free milk, and which are specified in Section 38651.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 25.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

38655.

Flavored high nutrient lowfat milk shall contain not more than 1.2 percent milk fat, and shall otherwise meet all standards and requirements which are specified in this division for high nutrient lowfat milk, and which are specified in Section 38651.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 26.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 25. Sour Cream [38671. - 38671.]

38671.

Sour cream is a food that complies with Section 131.160 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Sour cream shall contain not more than 10 coliform bacteria per gram.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 339, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 26. Sour Cream Dressing [38701. - 38703.]

38701.

Sour cream dressing is a product which is made from pasteurized market cream, with added milk solids derived from market milk, to which any strain, or two or more strains, of lactic acid producing organisms has been added to give it a distinct lactic acid flavor. It shall contain not less than 16 percent of milk fat and not less than 24 percent of total milk solids. It may contain salt and harmless edible stabilizers, emulsifiers, and coagulating enzymes as specified in Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 840, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

38702.

Sour cream dressing shall be labeled with the term “sour cream dressing” and with the name and address of the distributor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

38703.

At the time of sale to consumers, sour cream dressing shall be in containers of at least 12-gallon or 4-pound capacity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 641, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 27. Yogurt [38731. - 38732.]

38731.

Yogurt is a food that complies with Section 131.200 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Yogurt shall contain not more than 10 coliform bacteria per gram, and shall contain not more than 10 colonies per gram each of molds, yeasts, and other fungi.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 339, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

38732.

Whipped topping made from nonfat yogurt shall comply with the following standards:

(a) The product shall contain not less than 25 percent nonfat yogurt by weight.

(b) The product shall contain edible oil or fat other than milkfat and not less than 4 percent or more than 10 percent edible oil or fat from all sources.

(c) The product shall be sold in the frozen state and thawed prior to use. It shall weigh not less than two pounds per gallon.

(d) The product may contain nutritive carbohydrate sweeteners and may be characterized by the addition of flavoring ingredients.

(e) The product may contain harmless edible stabilizers and emulsifiers as specified in Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(f) The product may contain fruit juices, harmless flavoring, and harmless coloring.

(g) The product shall be pasteurized.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 95, Sec. 37.   Effective June 6, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 29. Light Cream, Heavy Cream, Whipping Creams, and Whipped Cream [38761. - 38765.]

38761.

For the purposes of this article light cream, light whipping cream, heavy cream, and whipped cream are market cream products and shall contain not more than 20,000 bacteria per gram and not more than 10 coliform bacteria per gram.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 339, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

38762.

Light cream, coffee cream, or table cream is a food that complies with Section 131.155 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 339, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

38763.

Light whipping cream or whipping cream is a food that complies with Section 131.157 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 339, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

38764.

Heavy cream or heavy whipping cream is a food that complies with Section 131.150 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 339, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

38765.

Whipped cream is a food that complies with Section 131.25 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 339, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 31. Eggnog [38791. - 38791.]

38791.

Eggnog is a food that complies with Section 131.170 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Eggnog shall contain not more than 20,000 bacteria per gram and not more than 10 coliform bacteria per gram.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 339, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 35. Milk Products Made by Acidified Processes [38861. - 38861.]

38861.

Acidified milk products are foods that comply with Section 131.111 or 131.162 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 30.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 36. Kefir Milk—A Cultured Milk [38871. - 38874.]

38871.

Market milk or market milk combined with nonfat milk from market milk, with or without added market milk solids, flavoring, or seasoning, which is certified raw milk or has been pasteurized and afterwards fermented by Lactobacillus bulgaricus, Lactobacillus acidophilus, and Lactobacillus caucasicus may be sold as kefir, reduced-fat kefir, lowfat or light (lite) kefir, or nonfat, skim, or fat-free kefir, or such names as may be characteristic for the product and approved by the secretary. The product may contain harmless edible stabilizers not to exceed six-tenths of 1 percent. It shall contain no more than 10 coliform bacteria per gram and shall be free of molds, yeasts, and other fungi, and other objectionable bacteria that may impair the quality of the product.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 31.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

38872.

Kefir shall contain not less than 3.5 percent milk fat. Reduced-fat kefir shall contain not more than 2.1 percent milk fat. Lowfat kefir shall contain not more than 1.2 percent milk fat. Nonfat, skim, or fat-free kefir shall contain a maximum of twenty hundredths of 1 percent milk fat.

Kefir made from goat milk shall contain not less than 2.8 percent of milk fat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 32.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

38873.

When offered for sale, kefir, reduced-fat kefir, lowfat or light (lite) kefir, and nonfat, skim, or fat-free kefir shall be labeled, on a principal panel of the container, with the name of the product, the name and address of the manufacturer or distributor, and a statement whether it is made from pasteurized milk or certified raw milk. If the name and address of the distributor are used, the factory license number of the manufacturer shall also appear on the carton or container. Kefir shall be labeled “Kefir a Cultured Milk.” Reduced-fat kefir shall be labeled “Reduced-fat Kefir a Cultured Milk.” Lowfat or light (lite) kefir shall be labeled “Lowfat Kefir a Cultured Milk” or “Light (Lite) Kefir a Cultured Milk.” Nonfat, skim, or fat-free kefir shall be labeled “Nonfat Kefir a Cultured Milk,” “Skim Kefir a Cultured Milk,” or “Fat-free Kefir a Cultured Milk.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 33.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

38874.

Kefir, reduced-fat kefir, lowfat or light (lite) kefir, or nonfat, skim, or fat-free kefir, in liquid form, and with or without fruit added, shall be made from market milk and may be labeled as “Certified Raw,” “Certified Pasteurized,” or “Grade A.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 34.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 37. Fruit Kefir—A Cultured Milk [38875. - 38876.]

38875.

Fruit kefir is kefir, reduced-fat kefir, lowfat or light (lite) kefir, or nonfat, skim, or fat-free kefir that contains not less than 8 percent by weight of clean, mature, sound fruit or its equivalent in other forms. The milk fat content of fruit kefir shall be not less than 2.8 percent. Lowfat or light (lite) fruit kefir shall contain not more than 1.2 percent milk fat. Reduced-fat kefir shall contain not more than 2 percent of milk fat. Nonfat, skim, or fat-free fruit kefir shall contain a maximum of twenty hundredths of 1 percent milk fat. Harmless coloring may be added to fruit kefir.

The milk fat content of fruit kefir made from goat milk shall not be less than 2.0 percent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 232, Sec. 4.   Effective August 4, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

38876.

When fruit is added to kefir, reduced-fat kefir, lowfat or light (lite) kefir, or nonfat, skim, or fat-free kefir, the name of the fruit shall appear on a panel of the carton or container immediately preceding the name of the product.

The words “Certified Raw,” “Certified Pasteurized,” or “Grade A” when used in the label of the product, shall precede the name of the fruit.

Fruit kefir in its composition and labeling shall otherwise comply with all the requirements of Article 36 (commencing with Section 38871).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 36.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 38. Lactose Reduced Milk, Reduced-Fat Lactose Reduced Milk, Lactose Reduced Lowfat or Light Milk, and Lactose Reduced Nonfat, Skim, or Fat-Free Milk [38881. - 38881.]

38881.

Lactose reduced milk, reduced-fat lactose reduced milk, lactose reduced lowfat or light (lite) milk, and lactose reduced nonfat, skim, or fat-free milk are market milk products resulting from the treatment of milk, reduced-fat milk, lowfat or light (lite) milk, or nonfat, skim, or fat-free milk by the addition of safe and suitable enzymes to convert sufficient amounts of the lactose to glucose or galactose so that the remaining lactose is less than 30 percent of the lactose in milk, reduced-fat milk, lowfat or light (lite) milk, or nonfat, skim, or fat-free milk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 37.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 39. Fromage Frais or Soft Fresh Cheese [38885. - 38888.]

38885.

Nonfat market milk, with or without added market milk solids, which has been pasteurized and afterwards fermented by one or more strains of streptococcus lactis, streptococcus cremoris, streptococcus diacethylactis, or leuconostoc sp., and rennet with or without pasteurized market cream, flavoring, or seasoning may be sold as fromage frais or soft fresh cheese. These products may contain nutritive carbohydrate sweeteners. They shall contain no more than 10 coliform bacteria per gram.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 38.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

38886.

Fromage frais or soft fresh cheese shall have at least 70 percent of the lactose in the original milk solids removed through the whey. Fromage frais or soft fresh cheese shall have a maximum dry matter content of 24.5 percent prior to the addition of any bulky flavors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 800, Sec. 8.   Effective September 15, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

38887.

Fromage frais or soft fresh cheese, without the addition of bulky flavors, shall contain not less than 3.5 percent of milk fat.

Fromage frais or soft fresh cheese made from goat milk, without the addition of bulky flavors, shall contain not less than 2.8 percent of milk fat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 329, Sec. 39.   Effective August 21, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

38888.

When offered for sale, fromage frais or soft fresh cheese shall be labeled on a principal panel of the container, with the name of the product, the name and address of the manufacturer or distributor. If the name and address of the distributor are used, the factory license number of the manufacturer shall also appear on the carton or container. Fromage frais or soft fresh cheese shall be labeled as “fromage frais” or “soft fresh cheese.”
